Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1617
Public employees; contributions; voluntary; commission to officer or employee prohibited.

Participation by employees in any plans requiring contributions from such employees shall be voluntary and no portion of any commission or other compensation paid by the corporation writing such coverage shall be received, directly or indirectly, by any officer or other person in the employment of the political subdivision, municipal corporation, public body, or agency, even though such person may be licensed by the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1959, c. 213, § 3, p. 735.